dictsource/py_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded 
// Spelling to phoneme rules for Pyash (an artificial constructed language).

// Note: initial/final "." has already been removed

.group a
	a	a


.group b
	b	b

.group c
	c	S

.group d
	d	d

.group e
	e	e

.group f
	f	f

.group g
	g	g

.group h
	h	h

.group i
	i	i

.group j
	j	Z

.group k
	k	k

.group l
	l       l

.group m
	m	m

.group n
        n     n

.group o
	o	o

.group p
	p	p

.group q
	q	N

.group r
        r	R


.group s
	s	s

.group t
	t	t

.group u
	u	u

.group v
	v	v

.group w
	w	w

.group x
	x	x

.group y
	y 	j

.replace 
	6 	@

.group h
	h 	h

.group z
	z	z


// low tone
//.group 2        
//	2 	˩
//// high tone
//.group 7        
//	7	˥

.group
	.	_!	// dot
     _)	. (@P1	_!      // remove . prefix
	. (_S1  _!	// remove . suffix


	ˈ	'       // U+2c8  stress marker (from syllable capitalisation)
// tones not working
.replace
	7	i
	2	u
	//6	@
//	2	˩
//	7	˥
